New Jersey, session 222, S1968.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1979, c.428 (C.18A:35-4.7) is amended to read as follows: 2.  a.  Any child whose parent or guardian [presents to the school principal a signed  statement that any part of the instructions in health, family life education or  sex education is in conflict with his conscience, or sincerely held moral or  religious beliefs] does not provide prior written consent to participate in any health, family life education, or sex education program shall be excused from that portion of the course where such  instruction is being given and no penalties as to credit or graduation shall  result therefrom. b.    Any parent or guardian may review the complete health, family life education, or sex education program curricula, including all supplemental materials, to be used in the education program in a class or course in which the parents or guardians child is enrolled.  A complete copy of all printed materials not subject to copyright protection and a description of all audio-visual materials shall be made available through any available parent or guardian online portal and kept in the school library or office and made available for review to any parent or guardian during school office hours before and during the school year.  The audio-visual materials shall be made available to parents and guardians for in-person review, upon request, on the same basis as printed materials are made available. c.     Each board of education shall develop and distribute to the parents or guardians of a student enrolled in a class or course in which a health, family life education, or sex education program is included in the curricula and post for public viewing on the school districts  website a summary designed to assist parents and guardians in understanding the program as such program progresses and to encourage parental guidance and involvement in the instruction of the students.  The summary shall reflect the curricula of the program as taught in the classroom and shall include contact information for the individual or office responsible for maintaining printed and audio-visual materials. (cf: P.L.1979, c.428, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.